Utah statutes.
31A-43-304.   Administrative rules.

The commissioner may adopt administrative rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to:

(1)  implement this chapter;

(2)  assure that differences in rates charged are reasonable and reflect objective differences in plan design;

(3)  define lasering practices that are prohibited by this chapter;

(4)  establish the form and manner of the actuarial certification and the annual report on stop-loss experience required by Section 31A-43-302;

(5)  establish the form and manner of the disclosure required by Section 31A-43-303;

(6)  assure the rates associated with the specific attachment points and aggregate attachment points are actuarially sound and are not against the public interest; and

(7)  assure that stop-loss contracts include provisions to cover incurred and unpaid claims if a small employer plan terminates.



Enacted by Chapter 341, 2013 General Session

